Georgia, session 2025_26, SB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
10 SECTION 1.
11 An Act known as the "Macon Water Authority Act," approved March 23, 1992 (Ga. L. 1992,
12 p. 4991), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 10, 2014 (Ga. L. 2014, p. 3889)
13 and an Act approved February 17, 2022 (Ga. L. 2022, p. 4143), is amended by revising
14 paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b), subsection (c), subsection (h), subsection (j), and
15 subsection (k) of Section 2 as follows:
S. B. 337
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0108
16 "(b)(1) The authority shall consist of nine members, eight of whom shall be elected as
17 provided in this section. The remaining member of the authority shall be a member of
18 the governing authority of Macon-Bill County to be appointed by the governing authority
19 of Macon-Bibb County and shall serve as a member of the authority at the pleasure of the
20 governing authority of Macon-Bibb County and only so long as they are a member of the
21 governing authority of Macon-Bibb County.
22 (2) For the purpose of electing members of the authority, Macon-Bibb County is divided
23 into eight electoral districts as follows:
24 (A) Districts 1 through 7 shall be and correspond to those numbered districts described
25 in Appendix A attached to and made a part of this Act and further identified as
26 'User: S026 Plan Name: MWA-7d-2025 Plan Type: Local.'
27 (B) District 8 shall consist of all of Macon-Bibb County."
28 "(c)(1) The county election superintendent of Macon-Bibb County shall conduct an
29 election as provided in this section for the purpose of electing new members to the
30 authority. The county election superintendent shall conduct such election on the Tuesday
31 immediately following the first Monday in November, 2025, for candidates from Districts
32 5, 6, and 7. Candidates elected from such districts shall take office on the first day of
33 January following their election. The candidate elected from District 5 shall serve for one
34 year and until a successor is duly elected and qualified. Thereafter, successors to such
35 members of the authority shall be elected in the general election, shall take office on the
36 first day of January following their election, and shall serve for terms of office of four
37 years and until the election and qualification of their successors. Candidates elected from
38 Districts 6 and 7 shall serve for three years and until their successors are duly elected and
39 qualified. Thereafter, successors to such members of the authority shall be elected in the
40 general election, shall take office on the first day of January following their election, and
41 shall serve for terms of office of four years and until the election and qualification of their
42 successors.
S. B. 337
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0108
43 (2) In 2026, candidates shall be elected from Districts 1, 4, 5, and 8. In 2028, candidates
44 shall be elected from Districts 2, 3, 6, and 7. Elections shall be nonpartisan elections
45 conducted as provided for in Code Section 21-2-139 of the O.C.G.A. Candidates elected
46 from such districts shall take office on the first day of January following their election
47 and successors to such members of the authority shall be elected in the general election
48 and shall serve for terms of office of four years and until the election and qualification
49 of their successors."
50 "(h) The salary for each elected member of the authority shall be $15,000.00 per year, to
51 be paid in 12 equal monthly payments. The salary for the chairperson shall be $25,000.00
52 per year to be paid in 12 equal monthly payments. All members of the authority, elected
53 and appointed, may be reimbursed for the actual expenses necessarily incurred by them in
54 the performance of their duties."
55 "(j) The chairperson of the authority shall be the member elected to represent District 8.
56 (k) A majority of the members in office shall constitute a quorum. The authority shall
57 hold meetings at least twice a month. The authority shall have perpetual existence;
58 provided, however, that nothing contained in this Act shall preclude the General Assembly
59 from amending this Act."
60 SECTION 2.
61 (a) Those elected members of the Macon Water Authority who are serving as such on the
62 effective date of this Act and any person selected to fill a vacancy in any such office shall
63 continue to serve as such members until the regular expiration of their respective terms of
64 office and upon the election and qualification of their respective successors.
65 (b) Districts 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5, as they exist immediately prior to the effective date of this Act,
66 shall continue to be designated as Districts 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5, respectively, but as newly
67 described under this Act, and on and after the effective date of this Act, such members of the
68 board serving from those former districts shall be deemed to be serving from and
S. B. 337
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0108
69 representing their respective districts as newly described under this Act. The chairperson of
70 the authority shall continue to serve as such until the end of his or her term, but shall be
71 considered to be the member from District 8.
72 SECTION 3.
73 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 337
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0108
74 APPENDIX A
75 User: S026
76 Plan Name: MWA-7d-2025
77 Plan Type: Local
78 District 001
79 County Bibb GA
80 VTD EAST MACON 1
81 Block 013800
82 2015 2016
83 VTD EAST MACON 2
84 VTD EAST MACON 4
85 VTD EAST MACON 5
86 VTD GODFREY 1
87 Block 010800
88 1051 1052
89 Block 013701
90 1057 1058 1059 1062 1063 1064 1066 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078
91 1079 1080 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093
92 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1107 1108 1109 1110
93 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124
94 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136
95 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148
96 1149 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160
97 1161 1162 1163 1164 1165 1166 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171 1172
98 1173 1174 1175 1177 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007
99 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2027 2028
S. B. 337
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0108
100 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2035 2041 2042 2043 2046 2047 2048
101 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060
102 2061
103 Block 013702
104 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1011 1012 1013 1014 2003
105 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035
106 Block 013900
107 2000 2001 2002 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008
108 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020
109 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032
110 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3049 3050
111 3051 3052 3053 3057 3058 3059 3063 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069
112 3117
113 VTD GODFREY 2
114 VTD RUTLAND 2
115 Block 013502
116 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
117 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023
118 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035
119 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047
120 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059
121 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071
122 1072 1073 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009
123 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021
124 2022 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029
125 Block 013506
126 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017
S. B. 337
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0108
127 1018 1019 1022 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
128 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020
129 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027
130 Block 013900
131 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3104 3105 3106
132 District 002
133 County Bibb GA
134 VTD EAST MACON 1
135 Block 011100
136 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
137 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023
138 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006
139 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018
140 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030
141 3031 3032 3033
142 Block 013800
143 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
144 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023
145 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035
146 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047
147 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059
148 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 2000 2001 2002
149 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014
150 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028
151 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040
S. B. 337
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0108
152 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052
153 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064
154 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069
155 Block 013900
156 1007 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1087
157 VTD EAST MACON 3
158 VTD GODFREY 1
159 Block 010400
160 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
161 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003
162 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 4000 4001 4006 4007
163 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4015 4016
164 Block 010500
165 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016
166 Block 013702
167 2006 2007 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2020 2021 2022
168 2023
169 Block 014000
170 1000 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015
171 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027
172 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039
173 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051
174 1052 2003 2004 2013 2014 2015 2016 2020 2021 3000 3027 3028
175 3035
176 VTD VINEVILLE 1
177 VTD VINEVILLE 2
178 VTD VINEVILLE 3
S. B. 337
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0108
179 Block 012200
180 1007 1008 1009 1010 1012 1013
181 Block 012500
182 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
183 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020
184 Block 014000
185 2000 2001 2002 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2017
186 2018 2019 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 3001 3002 3003 3004
187 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016
188 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3029 3030
189 3031 3032 3033 3034 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 4012
190 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024
191 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4034 4035 4036 4037
192 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044
193 District 003
194 County Bibb GA
195 VTD HOWARD 2
196 Block 013413
197 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1017
198 1019
199 VTD HOWARD 3
200 Block 012102
201 1000
202 Block 013407
203 1000 1001 3000 3001 3002 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006
S. B. 337
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0108
204 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018
205 Block 013408
206 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 3000 3001
207 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011
208 Block 013411
209 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
210 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023
211 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035
212 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011
213 2012 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010
214 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017
215 Block 013412
216 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006
217 Block 013413
218 1000 1001 1002 1008 1015 1016 1018
219 VTD HOWARD 4
220 VTD HOWARD 5
221 VTD HOWARD 7
222 Block 012102
223 1003 1010 1011 1012 3004 3006 3008 3009
224 Block 013407
225 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013
226 1014 1015 1016 1017 1027 1028 1029 1030 2000 2001 2002 2003
227 2004 2005 2006 2007 2010 2011
228 Block 013408
229 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
230 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1024 1025
S. B. 337
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0108
231 District 004
232 County Bibb GA
233 VTD HAZZARD 2
234 VTD HAZZARD 3
235 Block 013201
236 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006
237 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005
238 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017
239 3018 3019 3020 4000 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009
240 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022
241 4023 4024 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006
242 Block 013412
243 2024 2026
244 Block 013603
245 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1026 1027
246 Block 013604
247 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2023 3000 3001 3002 3003
248 3004
249 Block 013605
250 1004 1005 1007 1008
251 Block 013608
252 1005 1006 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009
253 2010 2011 2012 3000 3001 3002 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013
254 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019
255 VTD HAZZARD 4
256 VTD HOWARD 1
S. B. 337
- 11 -

25 LC 62 0108
257 Block 013409
258 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2011 2012 2014
259 Block 013605
260 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011
261 2012 2013
262 VTD HOWARD 2
263 Block 013412
264 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2027
265 District 005
266 County Bibb GA
267 VTD GODFREY 5
268 VTD HAZZARD 1
269 VTD HAZZARD 3
270 Block 013603
271 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018
272 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1028 1029 1030 1031 2002
273 Block 013604
274 3014 3015
275 VTD WARRIOR 1
276 VTD WARRIOR 2
277 District 006
278 County Bibb GA
279 VTD HOWARD 1
S. B. 337
- 12 -

25 LC 62 0108
280 Block 012101
281 1000 1001 1003 1004 1005 1006 1010 1011 1012 1017 1024 1025
282 1026 2000 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 2009 2010 2011 2015
283 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025
284 Block 012102
285 3012 3015 4008 4009
286 Block 012200
287 2047
288 Block 013412
289 1007 1009 1011 1016 1020 1023 1028 2001 2010 2011 2012 2013
290 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018
291 VTD HOWARD 2
292 Block 012101
293 1002 1007 1008 1009 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 1019 1020 1021
294 1022 1023 2004 2008 2012 2013 2014
295 Block 012200
296 2015 2046
297 Block 013201
298 4001 4010
299 Block 013412
300 1008 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1021 1024 1025 1026 1027 1029
301 2000 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2025 2028 2029
302 VTD HOWARD 3
303 Block 013412
304 1010 1012 1013 1022
305 VTD HOWARD 6
306 VTD HOWARD 7
S. B. 337
- 13 -

25 LC 62 0108
307 Block 012102
308 3007
309 VTD VINEVILLE 3
310 Block 012500
311 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2007 2008 2009
312 VTD VINEVILLE 4
313 VTD VINEVILLE 5
314 VTD VINEVILLE 6
315 District 007
316 County Bibb GA
317 VTD GODFREY 1
318 Block 010400
319 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023
320 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 3000 3001
321 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013
322 3014 3015 3016 3017 4002 4003 4004 4005 4014 4017 4018 4019
323 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031
324 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038
325 Block 010500
326 1007 1008 1009 1010 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024
327 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004
328 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015
329 Block 011500
330 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
331 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 2037
S. B. 337
- 14 -

25 LC 62 0108
332 2038 2039 2040 2041 2048 2049 2050 2056 2057
333 Block 012500
334 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011
335 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021
336 Block 012600
337 2006 2007 2008
338 Block 013201
339 2000
340 Block 013701
341 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2034 2036 2037
342 2038 2039 2040 2044 2045 2062
343 Block 013702
344 1007 1008 1009 1010 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022
345 1023 1024 1025 1026
346 VTD GODFREY 3
347 VTD GODFREY 4
348 VTD RUTLAND 1
S. B. 337
- 15 -